New Jersey, session 221, A559.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     New Jersey residents face the highest property tax burden in the United States and reducing this burden has been and continues to be a priority for the Legislature. b.    The ongoing effort to share and regionalize local government services has provided some relief over the years, but the Legislature is committed to doing more to encourage streamlining the delivery of local government services in order to reduce the property tax burden on State residents. c.     In an effort to further encourage streamlining, a determination of efficiency and scaling is required in order to inform the Legislature as to the most effective methods to achieve savings for taxpayers, while still ensuring a high level of quality in the delivery of services. d.    To make this critical determination, a study should be undertaken to identify the most efficient scale of service delivery so that the Legislature can move forward with data-driven policy changes. 2.    As used in P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Alternative service delivery method means contracting with a private for-profit or nonprofit entity, or utilizing volunteers, to deliver a service traditionally provided by a local unit. Joint contract means a contract between two or more local units to form a joint meeting pursuant to section 14 of P.L.2007, c.63 (C.40A:65-14). Local unit means a contracting unit pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-2), a "district" pursuant to N.J.S.18A:18A-2, a "county college" pursuant to N.J.S.18A:64A-1, a joint meeting, or any authority or special district that is subject to the "Local Authorities Fiscal Control Law," P.L.1983, c.313 (C.40A:5A-1 et seq.). "Shared service agreement" means a contract authorized under section 4 of P.L.2007, c.63 (C.40A:65-4). 3.    a.  The Edward J. Bloustein School of Planning and Public Policy of Rutgers, the State University of New Jersey shall conduct a comprehensive study to research scaling for the most efficient delivery of services by local units within the context of shared service agreements, joint contracts, and alternative service delivery methods.  Specifically, the study shall examine, but not be limited to increasing efficiency in the following areas of service delivery: (1) municipal courts; (2) construction code enforcement; (3) fire code enforcement; (4) municipal and county health services; (5) property tax assessments; (6) public works; and (7) provision of emergency services, including police, fire, and emergency medical response, and dispatch for emergency response. b.    The study may utilize a variety of research methods with a mission to collect and compile the data on which comprehensive decisions can be made to encourage the most efficient and effective streamlining of delivery of services by local units. c.     The Edward J. Bloustein School of Planning and Public Policy shall issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature within one year of the commencement of the study. 4.    There is appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund to Rutgers, The State University of New Jersey $30,000 to conduct the study and issue the report provided for in section 3 of P.L.   , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.